Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.490

Fish habitat enhancement project.

A fish habitat enhancement project meeting the criteria of RCW 77.55.181 is not subject to grading permits, inspections, or fees and shall be reviewed according to the provisions of RCW 77.55.181.

[ 2014 c 120 s 8; 2003 c 39 s 11; 1998 c 249 s 14.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Report—Effective date—1998 c 249: See notes following RCW 77.55.181.